Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1707
Costs on motions, continuances, and amendments.

Unless otherwise provided by statute, the costs of motions, continuances, amendments, and the like, shall be taxed and paid as the court in its discretion may direct.

R.S.1867, Code § 619, p. 504;

R.S.1913, § 8166;

C.S.1922, § 9117;

C.S.1929, § 20-1707;

R.S.1943, § 25-1707.